test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-minungkve_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (2007: 47)

  Verb - минуӈкве: # Verb 'eng go/fin mennä' - full paradigm
#
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: минасум
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: минасын
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: минас

     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: минасаме̄н
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: минасы̄н
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: минасы̄г

     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: минасув
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: минасы̄н
     минуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: минасыт
